Utah statutes.
75-2a-120.   Judicial relief.
A district court may enjoin or direct a health care decision, or order other
equitable relief based on a petition filed by:
(1)  a patient;
(2)  an agent of a patient;
(3)  a guardian of a patient;
(4)  a default surrogate of a patient;
(5)  a health care provider of a patient;
(6)  a health care facility providing care for a patient; or
(7)  an individual who meets the requirements of Section 75-2a-108.
